Hawaii statutes.
§286-6 County traffic or highway safety
councils. There is established in each county a county traffic or highway
safety council. The respective county councils may make appropriations to meet
the necessary expenses of their respective traffic or highway safety councils.

The following or their designated
representatives shall be members of a county traffic or highway safety
council: the mayor; the chief of police; the prosecuting attorney, corporation
counsel, or county attorney; the traffic engineer, chairperson of the traffic
commission or safety program coordinator; and not more than fifteen other
persons residing in the county who shall be appointed by the mayor on the basis
of their interest in highway safety and their knowledge of local conditions.

The county traffic or highway safety council
shall advise the mayor on matters relating to highway safety. [L 1967, c 214,
pt of §2; HRS §286-6; gen ch 1993]

Revision Note

"Boards of supervisors", "county
chairman", and "public prosecutor" deleted to conform to county
charters.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next